Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 10
DRIVING - OVERTAKING - PASSING

Cross references:

For penalties for class A traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-1001. Drive on right side - exceptions.

Upon all roadways of sufficient width, a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:

When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement;

When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway; but any person so doing shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;

Upon a roadway divided into three lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or

Upon a roadway restricted to one-way traffic as indicated by official traffic control devices.

Upon all roadways any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, no vehicle shall be driven to the left of the center line of the roadway, except when authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use such lanes or except as permitted under subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection (3) does not prohibit the crossing of the center line in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road, or driveway when such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with, impeding, or endangering other traffic lawfully using the highway.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2357, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-901 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1001 was relocated to § 42-4-1101.

42-4-1002. Passing oncoming vehicles.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right, and, upon roadways having width for not more than one lane of traffic in each direction, each driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the main-traveled portion of the roadway as nearly as possible.

A driver shall not pass a bicyclist moving in the same direction and in the same lane when there is oncoming traffic unless the driver can simultaneously:

Allow oncoming vehicles at least one-half of the main-traveled portion of the roadway in accordance with subsection (1) of this section; and

Allow the bicyclist at least a three-foot separation between the right side of the driver's vehicle, including all mirrors or other projections, and the left side of the bicyclist at all times.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2358, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1087, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-902 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1002 was relocated to § 42-4-1102.

42-4-1003. Overtaking a vehicle on the left.

The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to the limitations, exceptions, and special rules stated in this section and sections 42-4-1004 to 42-4-1008:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left of the vehicle at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.

The driver of a motor vehicle overtaking a bicyclist proceeding in the same direction shall allow the bicyclist at least a three-foot separation between the right side of the driver's vehicle, including all mirrors or other projections, and the left side of the bicyclist at all times.

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the speed of the driver's vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2358, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1088, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-903 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1003 was relocated to § 42-4-1103.

42-4-1004. When overtaking on the right is permitted.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or giving indication of making a left turn;

Upon a street or highway with unobstructed pavement not occupied by parked vehicles and marked for two or more lanes of moving vehicles in each direction; or

Upon a one-way street or upon any roadway on which traffic is restricted to one direction of movement where the roadway is free from obstructions and marked for two or more lanes of moving vehicles.

(1.5) The driver of a motor vehicle upon a one-way roadway with two or more marked traffic lanes, when overtaking a bicyclist proceeding in the same direction and riding on the left-hand side of the road, shall allow the bicyclist at least a three-foot separation between the left side of the driver's vehicle, including all mirrors or other projections, and the right side of the bicyclist at all times.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting such movement in safety. In no event shall such movement be made by driving off the pavement or main-traveled portion of the roadway.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2359, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1088, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-904 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1004 was relocated to § 42-4-1104.

42-4-1005. Limitations on overtaking on the left.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless authorized by the provisions of this article and unless such left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit such overtaking and passing to be completed without interfering with the operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon as practicable and, in the event the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for vehicles approaching from the opposite direction, before coming within two hundred feet of any approaching vehicle.

No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the roadway under the following conditions:

When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the highway where the driver's view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

When approaching within one hundred feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing; or

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred feet of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel.

The department of transportation and local authorities are authorized to determine those portions of any highway under their respective jurisdictions where overtaking and passing or driving on the left side of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of such zones. Where such signs or markings are in place to define a no-passing zone and such signs or markings are clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, no driver shall drive on the left side of the roadway within such no-passing zone or on the left side of any pavement striping designed to mark such no-passing zone throughout its length.

The provisions of this section shall not apply:

Upon a one-way roadway;

Under the conditions described in section 42-4-1001 (1)(b);

To the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway when such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with, impeding, or endangering other traffic lawfully using the highway; or

To the driver of a vehicle passing a bicyclist moving the same direction and in the same lane when such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with, impeding, or endangering other traffic lawfully using the highway.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2359, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(4)(d) added, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1088, § 4, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-905 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1005 was relocated to § 42-4-1105.

42-4-1006. One-way roadways and rotary traffic islands.

Upon a roadway restricted to one-way traffic, a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated at all or such times as shall be indicated by official traffic control devices.

A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island shall be driven only to the right of such island.

The department of transportation and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may designate any roadway, part of a roadway, or specific lanes upon which vehicular traffic shall proceed in one direction at all or such times as shall be indicated by official traffic control devices. In the case of streets which are a part of the state highway system, the regulation shall be subject to the approval of the department of transportation pursuant to section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2360, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-906 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1007. Driving on roadways laned for traffic.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for traffic, the following rules in addition to all others consistent with this section shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practicable entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from such lane until the driver has first ascertained that such movement can be made with safety.

Upon a roadway which is divided into three lanes and provides for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction where the roadway is clearly visible and such center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for a left turn, or where such center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to the traffic moving in the direction the vehicle is proceeding and is designated by official traffic control devices to give notice of such allocation. Under no condition shall an attempt be made to pass upon the shoulder or any portion of the roadway remaining to the right of the indicated right-hand traffic lane.

Official traffic control devices may be erected directing specified traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of the roadway, and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device.

Official traffic control devices may be installed prohibiting the changing of lanes on sections of roadway, and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device.

The department of transportation may designate with signage an area on a roadway not otherwise laned for traffic for use by commercial vehicles, as defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a), that are designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver, and that are operated by a governmental entity or government-owned business that transports the general public or by a contractor on behalf of such an entity or government-owned business. Use of such an area is limited to vehicles authorized by the department operating under conditions of use established by the department but, subject to the conditions of use, the driver of an authorized vehicle has sole discretion to decide whether or not to drive on such an area based on the driver's assessment of the safety of doing so. The department shall consult with the Colorado state patrol before granting authorization for use of the area and establishing conditions of use. The department shall impose and each authorized user shall acknowledge the conditions of use by written agreement, and the department need not note the conditions of use in roadway signage. An authorized user does not violate this section or section 42-4-1004 when operating in accordance with the conditions of use for an area imposed by the department and acknowledged by the user in a written agreement.

The department of transportation shall work with local governmental agencies in implementing the provisions of this subsection (2).

A person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2360, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2016:

(2) amended and (3) added, (HB 16-1008), ch. 8, p. 15, § 1, effective March 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-907 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1008. Following too closely.

The driver of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

The driver of any motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district and which is following another motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger; except that this shall not prevent a motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any like vehicle or other vehicle.

Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade, whether or not towing other vehicles, shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each such vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision shall not apply to funeral processions.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2361, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-908 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1008.5. Crowding or threatening bicyclist.

The driver of a motor vehicle shall not, in a careless and imprudent manner, drive the vehicle unnecessarily close to, toward, or near a bicyclist.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits careless driving as described in section 42-4-1402.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1088, § 5, effective August 5.

42-4-1009. Coasting prohibited.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a downgrade shall not coast with the gears or transmission of such vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a truck or bus when traveling upon a downgrade shall not coast with the clutch disengaged.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2361, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-909 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1010. Driving on divided or controlled-access highways.

Whenever any highway has been divided into separate roadways by leaving an intervening space or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing section so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, every vehicle shall be driven only upon the right-hand roadway, unless directed or permitted to use another roadway by official traffic control devices. No vehicle shall be driven over, across, or within any such dividing space, barrier, or section, except through an opening in such physical barrier or dividing section or space or at a crossover or intersection as established, unless specifically prohibited by official signs and markings or by the provisions of section 42-4-902. However, this subsection (1) does not prohibit a left turn across a median island formed by standard pavement markings or other mountable or traversable devices as prescribed in the state traffic control manual when such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with, impeding, or endangering other traffic lawfully using the highway.

No person shall drive a vehicle onto or from any controlled-access roadway except at such entrances and exits as are established by public authority.

Wherever an acceleration lane has been provided in conjunction with a ramp entering a controlled-access highway and the ramp intersection is not designated or signed as a stop or yield intersection as provided in section 42-4-703 (1), drivers may use the acceleration lane to attain a safe speed for merging with through traffic when conditions permit such acceleration with safety. Traffic so merging shall be subject to the rule governing the changing of lanes as set forth in section 42-4-1007 (1)(a).

Wherever a deceleration lane has been provided in conjunction with a ramp leaving a controlled-access highway, drivers shall use such lane to slow to a safe speed for making an exit turn after leaving the mainstream of faster-moving traffic.

The department of transportation may by resolution or order entered in its minutes and local authorities may by ordinance consistent with the provisions of section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S., with respect to any controlled-access highway under their respective jurisdictions, prohibit the use of any such highway by any class or kind of traffic which is found to be incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic. The department of transportation or the local authority adopting such prohibitory regulations shall install official traffic control devices in conformity with the standards established by sections 42-4-601 and 42-4-602 at entrance points or along the highway on which such regulations are applicable. When such devices are so in place, giving notice thereof, no person shall disobey the restrictions made known by such devices. This subsection (3) shall not be construed to give the department authority to regulate pedestrian use of highways in a manner contrary to the provisions of section 42-4-805.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2362, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-910 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1011. Use of runaway vehicle ramps.

No person shall use a runaway vehicle ramp unless such person is in an emergency situation requiring use of the ramp to stop such person's vehicle.

No person shall stop, stand, or park a vehicle on a runaway vehicle ramp or in the pathway of the ramp.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2363, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-911 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1012. High occupancy vehicle (HOV) and high occupancy toll (HOT) lanes.

The department of transportation and local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their respective jurisdictions, may designate exclusive or preferential lanes for vehicles that carry a specified number of persons. The occupancy level of vehicles and the time of day when lane usage is restricted to high occupancy vehicles, if applicable, shall be designated by official traffic control devices.

On or before July 1, 2001, the department shall issue a request for proposals to private entities for the purpose of entering into a contract with such an entity for the conversion of an existing high occupancy vehicle lane described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to a high occupancy toll lane and for the purpose of entering into a contract for the operation of the high occupancy toll lane by a private entity; except that the department may convert or operate the high occupancy toll lane, or both, in the event that no proposal by a private entity for such conversion or operation, or both, is acceptable.

The high occupancy toll lane shall be a lane for use by vehicles carrying less than the specified number of persons for such high occupancy vehicle lane that pay a specified toll or fee.

Any contract entered into between the department and a private entity pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall:

Authorize the private entity to impose tolls for use of the high occupancy toll lane;

Require that over the term of such contract only toll revenues be applied to payment of the private entity's capital outlay costs for the project, the costs associated with operations, toll collection, administration of the high occupancy toll lane, if any, and a reasonable return on investment to the private entity, as evidenced by and consistent with the returns on investment to private entities on similar public and private projects;

Require that any excess toll revenue either be applied to any indebtedness incurred by the private entity with respect to the project or be paid into the state highway fund created pursuant to section 43-1-219, C.R.S., for exclusive use in the corridor where the high occupancy toll lane is located including for maintenance and enforcement purposes in the high occupancy toll lane and for other traffic congestion relieving options including transit. Such contract shall define or provide a method for calculating excess toll revenues and shall specify the amount of indebtedness that the private entity may incur and apply excess toll revenues to before such revenues must be paid into the state highway fund. It is not the intent of the general assembly that the conversion of a high occupancy vehicle lane to a high occupancy toll lane shall detract in any way from the possible provision of mass transit options by the regional transportation district or any other agency in the corridor where the high occupancy toll lane is located.

The department shall structure a variable toll or fee to ensure a level of service C and unrestricted access to the lanes at all times by eligible vehicles, including buses, carpools, and EPA certified low-emitting vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating over ten thousand pounds.

The department shall not enter into a contract for the conversion of a high occupancy vehicle lane to a high occupancy toll lane if such a conversion will result in the loss or refund of federal funds payable, available, or paid to the state for construction, reconstruction, repairs, improvement, planning, supervision, and maintenance of the state highway system and other public highways.

The department shall require the private entity entering into a contract pursuant to this section to provide such performance bond or other surety for the project as the department may reasonably require.

Whenever practicable, a high occupancy toll lane described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be physically separated from the other lanes of a street or highway so as to minimize the interference between traffic in the designated lanes and traffic in the other lanes.

The department shall develop and adopt functional specifications and standards for an automatic vehicle identification system for use on high occupancy vehicle lanes, high occupancy toll lanes, any public highway constructed and operated under the provisions of part 5 of article 4 of title 43, C.R.S., and any other street or highway where tolls or charges are imposed for the privilege of traveling upon such street or highway. The specifications and standards shall ensure that:

Automatic vehicle identification systems utilized by the state, municipality, or other entity having jurisdiction over the street or highway are compatible with one another;

A vehicle owner shall not be required to purchase or install more than one device to use on all toll facilities;

Toll facility operators have the ability to select from different manufacturers and vendors of automatic vehicle identification systems; and

There is compatibility between any automatic vehicle identification system in operation on August 4, 1999, and any automatic vehicle identification system designed and installed on and after said date; except that the operator of an automatic vehicle identification system in operation on August 4, 1999, may replace such system with a different system that is not compatible with the system in operation on August 4, 1999, subject to the approval of the department. After the department approves such replacement, the specifications and standards developed pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be amended to require compatibility with the replacement system.

A motorcycle may be operated upon high occupancy vehicle lanes pursuant to section 163 of Public Law 97-424 or upon high occupancy toll lanes, unless prohibited by official traffic control devices.

(2.5) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (2.5), a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that is either an inherently low-emission vehicle or a hybrid vehicle may be operated upon high occupancy vehicle lanes without regard to the number of persons in the vehicle and without payment of a special toll or fee. The exemption relating to hybrid vehicles shall apply only if such exemption does not affect the receipt of federal funds and does not violate any federal laws or regulations.

As used in this subsection (2.5), "inherently low-emission vehicle" or "ILEV" means:

A light-duty vehicle or light-duty truck, regardless of whether such vehicle or truck is part of a motor vehicle fleet, that has been certified by the federal environmental protection agency as conforming to the ILEV guidelines, procedures, and standards as published in the federal register at 58 FR 11888 (March 1, 1993) and 59 FR 50042 (September 30, 1994), as amended from time to time; and

A heavy-duty vehicle powered by an engine that has been certified as set forth in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II).

As used in this subsection (2.5), "hybrid vehicle" means a motor vehicle with a hybrid propulsion system that uses an alternative fuel by operating on both an alternative fuel, including electricity, and a traditional fuel.

No person shall operate a vehicle upon a high occupancy vehicle lane pursuant to this subsection (2.5) unless the vehicle:

Meets all applicable federal emission standards set forth in 40 CFR sec. 88.311-93, as amended from time to time, or, subject to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5), is a hybrid vehicle; and

Is identified by means of a circular sticker or decal at least four inches in diameter, made of bright orange reflective material, and affixed either to the windshield, to the front of the side-view mirror on the driver's side, or to the front bumper of the vehicle. Said sticker or decal shall be approved by the Colorado department of transportation.

The department of transportation and local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their respective jurisdictions, shall provide information via official traffic control devices to indicate that ILEVs and, subject to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5), hybrid vehicles may be operated upon high occupancy vehicle lanes pursuant to this section. Such information may, but need not, be added to existing printed signs, but as existing printed signs related to high occupancy vehicle lane use are replaced or new ones are erected, such information shall be added. In addition, whenever existing electronic signs are capable of being reprogrammed to carry such information, they shall be so reprogrammed by September 1, 2003.

In consultation with the regional transportation district, the department of transportation and local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their respective jurisdictions, shall, in connection with their periodic level-of-service evaluation of high occupancy vehicle lanes, perform a level-of-service evaluation of the use of high occupancy vehicle lanes by ILEVs and hybrid vehicles. If the use of high occupancy vehicle lanes by ILEVs or hybrid vehicles is determined to cause a significant decrease in the level of service for other bona fide users of such lanes, then the department of transportation or a local authority may restrict or eliminate use of such lanes by ILEVs or hybrid vehicles.

If the United States secretary of transportation makes a formal determination that, by giving effect to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) on a particular highway or lane, the state of Colorado would disqualify itself from receiving federal highway funds the state would otherwise qualify to receive or would be required to refund federal transportation grant funds it has already received, then said paragraph (a) shall not be effective as to such highway or lane.

Any person who uses a high occupancy vehicle lane in violation of restrictions imposed by the department of transportation or local authorities commits a class A traffic infraction.

Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) committed within a twelve-month period shall be subject to an increased penalty pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(K).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2363, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1359, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2.5) added, p. 1205, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(1), (2), (2.5)(a)(II)(A), and (2.5)(b)(I) amended, p. 1319, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(1)(d)(IV) amended, p. 737, § 7, effective August 7; (1)(d)(IV) amended, p. 717, § 7, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(2.5)(a)(I), (2.5)(b)(I), (2.5)(c), and (2.5)(d)(I) amended and (2.5)(a)(III) added, p. 1235, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2009:

(2.5)(a)(III) amended, (HB 09-1331), ch. 416, p. 2310, § 12, effective June 4.

Cross references:

(1) In 2009, subsection (2.5)(a)(III) was amended by the "Motor Vehicle Innovation Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 416, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

(2) For specific definitions of levels of service A through F, see the Highway Capacity Manual published by the Transportation Research Board.

42-4-1013. Passing lane - definitions - penalty.

A person shall not drive a motor vehicle in the passing lane of a highway if the speed limit is sixty-five miles per hour or more unless such person is passing other motor vehicles that are in a nonpassing lane or turning left, or unless the volume of traffic does not permit the motor vehicle to safely merge into a nonpassing lane.

For the purposes of this section:

"Nonpassing lane" means any lane that is to the right of the passing lane if there are two or more adjacent lanes of traffic moving in the same direction in one roadway.

"Passing lane" means the farthest to the left lane if there are two or more adjacent lanes of traffic moving in the same direction in one roadway; except that, if such left lane is restricted to high occupancy vehicle use or is designed for left turns only, the passing lane shall be the lane immediately to the right of such high occupancy lane or left-turn lane.

A person who violates this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 124, § 1, effective July 1.